tira/lexicon.lexd
# Verbs

PATTERN ItivePerfectiveVerbStem
:VerbRoot(1) High :VerbRoot(2) VerbRoot(1): Extension? FinalVowel[IT,PFV] Low

PATTERN ItiveImperfectiveVerbStem
:VerbRoot(1) High :VerbRoot(2) VerbRoot(1): Extension? FinalVowel[IT,-PFV] Low

PATTERN VentiveVerbStem
:VerbRoot(1) Low :VerbRoot(2) VerbRoot(1): Extension? FinalVowel[-IT] High

PATTERN InflectedVerb
ClassPrefix[-noun] Aux[-PFV] ItiveImperfectiveVerbStem
ClassPrefix[-noun] Aux[-PFV] VentiveVerbStem
ClassPrefix[-noun] VentiveVerbStem[V_init]
ClassPrefix[-noun] [:ə̀] VentiveVerbStem[-V_init]
ClassPrefix[-noun] Aux[PFV] ItivePerfectiveVerbStem
# CL à vérb-ɛ̀

# Nouns

PATTERN Noun
# General pattern: CL NounRoot
ClassPrefix[ð] NounRoot[ð_sg] [<sg>:]
ClassPrefix[ŋ] NounRoot[ŋ_sg] [<sg>:]

ClassPrefix[r] NounRoot[r_pl] [<pl>:]
ClassPrefix[ɲ] NounRoot[ɲ_pl] [<pl>:]
ClassPrefix[g,noun] NounRoot[g_pl] [<pl>:]
ClassPrefix[j] NounRoot[j_pl] [<pl>:]

PATTERN Adjective
ClassPrefix[-noun] AdjectiveRoot

PATTERNS
InflectedVerb
Noun
Adjective

LEXICON Aux
<AUX.PFV.IT>:à[PFV]
<AUX.IPFV>:á

LEXICON High
<H>:\High

LEXICON Low
<L>:\Low

LEXICON VerbRoot(2)
carry:a p[V_init]
weave:mɛ ð
braid:kɔ t̪

LEXICON ClassPrefix
<CLð>:ð[ð]
<CLŋ>:ŋ[ŋ]
<CLr>:r[r]
<CLɲ>:ɲ[ɲ]
<CLg>:[g,noun]
<CLg>:k[g]
<CLj>:j[j]

LEXICON FinalVowel
<FVɔ>:ɔ
<FVa>:a[IT]
<FVɛ>:ɛ[IT,PFV]

LEXICON Extension
<CAUS>:ìj
<PASS>:ìn
<ANTIP>:ìð
<BEN>:ìt̪

LEXICON NounRoot
tree:ùɽì[ð_sg,g_pl]
rope:ár[ð_sg,j_pl]
man:ɔ̀mɔ̀cɔ̀[ð_sg,r_pl]
dog:ɛ̂n[ŋ_sg,ɲ_pl]

LEXICON AdjectiveRoot
good:ìcə̀lò
bad:ìcò
big:ə̀ɽà
